District of Columbia statutes.
26-302

Requirement of license.

Except as provided in § 26-303 no person, including a person doing so on May 12, 1998, shall engage in the business of cashing checks for consideration without first obtaining a license from the Superintendent [Commissioner] pursuant to this chapter. No separate license under this chapter shall be required for any agent of a licensee.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 3, 45 DCR 1782

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1102.